Maine, session 132, LD1637.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13083-G, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 641, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Intermediate goal. Recover economic losses and total job losses in the primary
impact community resulting from the base closure; and
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §13083-G, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 641, §1, is amended
to read:
3. Long-term goal. Facilitate the maximum redevelopment of base properties.; and
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §13083-G, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Environmental stewardship. Engage in environmental stewardship to protect
against harm to the environment and residents of the primary impact community.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §13083-I, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 599, §1, is amended
to read:
2. Membership; appointment. The authority is governed by a board of trustees
composed of 11 12 voting members appointed pursuant to paragraphs C and D by the
Governor and subject to review by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over economic development matters and to confirmation by the Senate and one
additional trustee who serves as a voting member appointed pursuant to paragraph F by the
Governor.
A. Trustees Except for the trustee appointed pursuant to paragraph F, trustees are
appointed for 4-year terms, except that, for initial appointments, 3 trustees are
appointed to one-year terms, 3 trustees are appointed to 2-year terms, 2 trustees are
appointed to 3-year terms, 2 trustees are appointed to 4-year terms and the
commissioner commissioners designated pursuant to paragraph D serves serve at the
pleasure of the Governor. A vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.
Page 1 - 132LR1631(03)

B. A trustee continues to hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified, but
the term of the successor is not altered from the original expiration date of the holdover
trustee's term.
C. The Governor shall make 10 appointments appoint 10 trustees, who serve as voting
members, of which no fewer than 7 must be from candidates who are residents of
Androscoggin County, Cumberland County and Sagadahoc County and are nominated
by the primary impact communities at least 3 are residents of Brunswick, Brunswick
town officials or Brunswick business owners and at least one is a resident of Topsham,
a staff member of the Topsham town administration or a Topsham business owner.
The Governor shall appoint members who reflect the diversity of interests represented
by these communities.
D. The Governor shall designate a commissioner 2 commissioners of a department 2
different departments of State Government to be a voting, ex officio member members
of the board of trustees.
E. A member appointed to the board of trustees may not hold an elected office in
municipal, county or state government.
F. The Governor shall appoint one trustee, who serves as a voting member, from a
preapproved list of candidates for the trustee seat provided by the Brunswick town
council.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §13083-K, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Uniform Environmental Covenants Act. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, all property held by the authority is subject to the Uniform Environmental
Covenants Act.
Sec. 6. 38 MRSA §488, sub-§15, as amended by PL 2011, c. 551, §2, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new last blocked paragraph to read:
The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a proposed development to be located on
property owned or controlled by the Midcoast Regional Redevelopment Authority
established in Title 5, section 13083-G.
Sec. 7. Establishment of environmental covenants. No later than January 1,
2027, the board of trustees of the Midcoast Regional Redevelopment Authority shall enter
into environmental covenants pursuant to the Uniform Environmental Covenants Act for
all property held by the authority.
Page 2 - 132LR1631(03)